src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON DUHATCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ; ! Acc = Nom for duhát
 +Num+Sg+Gen: K ; ! Short genitive.       !
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;        !duhatjienat
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>in K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
            :#     NARE ;

LEXICON OKTADUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :#duhát#  NARE ;


LEXICON GUOKTEDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :e#duhát#  NARE ;

LEXICON NUBBEDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON GOLBMADUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :#duhát#  NARE ;
     
LEXICON VIHTTADUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:đa#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:đa#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :htta#duhát#  NARE ;

LEXICON CIEZADUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#duhát K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :eža#duhát#  NARE ;

LEXICON GAVCCIDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#duhát NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
            :%>X4#duhát#  NARE ;





LEXICON BEANNOT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** one and a half
+Ess:nubbi%>n K ;
+Sg+Gen:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:nubbi%>X4 K ;
!  :nubbi%>X4X7 NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:nubbi%>X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:nubbi%>X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:nubbi%>X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:nubbi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:nubbi%>X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen:nubbi%>X5jd9 NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:nubbi%>X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:nubbi%>X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:nubbi%>X5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:nubbi%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON NARE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
náre+v1+Num+Attr:náre K ;
náre+v1+Num+Sg+Nom:náre K ;
náre+v1+Num+Sg+Acc:náre K ;
náre+v1+Num+Sg+Gen:náre K ;
náre+v2+Num+Attr:nár K ;
náre+v3+Num+Attr:nar K ;
náre+Num+Attr+Err/Orth:naere K ;
náre+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:naere K ;
náre+Num+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:naere K ;
náre+Num+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:naere K ;



LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Span+Pl+Nom:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Span+Pl+Gen:    # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Span+Pl+Acc:    # ;
 +Num+Sem/Year+Span+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc:%:s # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
 dateyearcase_nullsuff ;
 dateyearcase_fullsuff ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff
          +Sg+Nom: # ;
          +Sg+Gen: # ;
          +Sg+Acc: # ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: # ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
          +Sg+Nom: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Ill+Attr: MARKDOT ;
     +Sg+Loc+Attr: MARKDOT ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc:%:a  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:%:a  #      ;
          +Sg+Loc:%:s  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:s    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:is #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:is   #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Loc:%:as #      ;
          +Sg+Ill:%:i  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:i    #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:%:ii #      ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:∑-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:∑–   ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
DIGITCASE0 ;
DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON DIGITCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
      +Sg+Nom:     #      ;
      +Sg+Gen:     #      ;
      +Sg+Acc:     #      ;
      +Sg+Nom+Attr:     #      ;
      +Sg+Gen+Attr:     #      ;
      +Sg+Acc+Attr:     #      ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:     #      ;
 +Sg+Loc+Attr:     #      ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:     #      ;
 +Ess+Attr:     #      ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%:∑- ENDLEX ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%:∑– ENDLEX ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!  +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:        # ;
!    f+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:f       # ; ! s. 123f.
!   ff+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:ff      # ; ! s. 123ff.
! b+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:b       # ; ! § 123b
! c+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:c       # ; ! § 123c
! d+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:d       # ; ! § 123d
! e+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:e       # ; ! § 123e
! š+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:š       # ;

!           +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:        # ;
!           +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:        # ;
            +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>a     # ; ! But here 123a 123
            +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>a     # ;
            +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ža    # ;
            +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ža    # ;
              +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>i     # ;
            +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ij    # ;
            +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>aj    # ;
            +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>žij   # ;
            +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>áj    # ; ! Testing over the weekend. !
                     +Sg+Loc:%>s     K ;
            +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>is    K ;
            +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>žis   K ;
            +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>as    # ;
                     +Sg+Com:%>in    # ;
            +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>žijn  # ;
            +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ain   # ;
                        +Ess:%>n     # ;
               +Ess+Err/Orth:%>žin   # ;
               +Ess+Err/Orth:%>an    # ;
                     +Pl+Nom:%>t     K ;
            +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>ijd9  K ;
              +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>id9   K ;
            +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ijd9  K ;
              +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>id9   K ;
            +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ijde  K ; ! 100:iide čuđiide
            +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>ijdda K ; ! 1000:idda duháhiidda
              +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:%>ide   K ; ! 100:iide čuđiide
            +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>idda  K ; ! 1000:idda duháhiidda
                     +Pl+Loc:%>in    K ;
                     +Pl+Com:%>igujn K ;

 LEXICON ARABICCASEORD   !!≈ * **@CODE@** ordinals
 +Sg+Gen:%>da      K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>da      K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>dij     K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>dis     K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>dijn    K ;
    +Ess:%>din     K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>dat     K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>dijd9   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>dijd9   K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>dijdda  K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>dijn    K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>dijgujn K ;

 LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR   !!≈ * **@CODE@** ordinal inflection when preceded
 !! by .:, and with reduced case forms. The Err/Orth tag is added in the calling lexicon.
 +Sg+Gen:%>a      K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>a      K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij     K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>is     K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>ijn    K ;
    +Ess:%>in     K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at     K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijd9   K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd9   K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda  K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijn    K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;

! LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL   !!≈ * **@CODE@** collectives
! +Sg+Nom:%>s    K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>sa   K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>sa   K ;
! +Sg+Ill:%>sij  K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>sis  K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>sijn K ;


LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Rom+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a  # ; !  But here 123a 123
 +Rom+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a  # ; !
          +Rom+Sg+Ill+Use/Circ:%>i  # ; !
 +Rom+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>ij # ; !
 +Rom+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>áj # ; !
          +Rom+Sg+Loc+Use/Circ:%>s  # ; !
          +Rom+Sg+Com+Use/Circ:%>in # ; !
             +Rom+Ess+Use/Circ:%>n  # ; !
